Maryland, session 2025, SB0546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0546*

SENATE BILL 546
4–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “County liaison” means a county official, or the designee of the county official,
who coordinates communication between the organizing committee and the county.
(c) “Organizing committee” means the group of individuals from the organizing
community that works with the county commissioners or county council on the proposed
municipal incorporation after a petition for incorporation is verified.
(d) “Organizing community” means individuals residing in an unincorporated
area who are interested in forming a municipality.
4–202.
This subtitle governs municipal incorporation.
4–203.
An area proposed to be incorporated shall contain at least 300 residents before the
organizing community may proceed under this subtitle.
4–204.
(a) A proposal to incorporate an area as a municipality is initiated when a valid
petition is presented to the county commissioners or county council of a county by:
(1) at least 25% of the registered voters who are residents of the area
proposed to be incorporated; or
(2) at least 20% of the registered voters who are residents of the area
proposed to be incorporated, together with the owners of at least 25% of the assessed
valuation of the real property of the area proposed to be incorporated.
(b) The Office of the Attorney General shall:
(1) create a standard petition form for use by an organizing community;
and
(2) provide the board of elections of each county with the form for
distribution to an organizing community.
(c) A petition presented under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) express the interest of the subscribing individuals in the incorporation

SENATE BILL 546 3
of the area;
(2) contain a detailed description of the boundaries of the area proposed to
be incorporated, including a survey of courses and distances or general landmarks and
place names;
(3) state the name of the new municipality, which may not be the same as
a name used by a municipality or county in the State; and
(4) state the names of the individuals who will initially represent the
organizing community on the organizing committee.
(d) The organizing community shall obtain the minimum number of valid
signatures required under subsection (a) of this section within 18 months after the
organizing community receives the standard petition form from the county board of
elections.
(e) Each person signing the petition shall indicate on the petition:
(1) the person’s name and residence address; and
(2) if the petition is intended to be presented under subsection (a)(2) of this
section and the person signing the petition owns real property in the area proposed to be
incorporated, the location and assessed valuation of the property.
(f) Within 60 days after receiving a petition, the county commissioners or county
council shall:
(1) verify that each person who signed the petition:
(i) resides in the area proposed to be incorporated;
(ii) is registered to vote in the elections of that county; and
(iii) if applicable, owns real property within the area proposed to be
incorporated;
(2) verify that the petition meets the requirements of this section; and
(3) appoint a county liaison if the petition meets the requirements of this
section.
(g) A petition, when received, becomes the property of the county commissioners
or county council and may not be used to initiate another incorporation.
(h) A proposal to incorporate a municipality and to adopt a municipal charter may
not be rescinded after the formal submission of the proposal in a manner other than that

SENATE BILL 546
of a formal charter repeal as provided in §§ 4–313 and 4–314 of this title.
4–205.
(a) (1) Within 90 days after the county commissioners or county council has
verified that a petition presented under § 4–204 of this subtitle is valid, the organizing
committee shall:
(i) actively seek information and input from the county;
(ii) hold a public meeting to collect testimony on the proposed
incorporation; [and]
(III) DETERMINE:
1. THE LIKELY FISCAL EFFECT OF THE PROPOSED
INCORPORATION ON RESIDENTS OF THE PROPOSED MUNICIPALITY, RESIDENTS IN
THE VICINITY OF THE PROPOSED MUNICIPALITY, AND THE COUNTY;
2. THE SERVICES THAT THE PROPOSED MUNICIPALITY
IS EXPECTED TO PROVIDE; AND
3. ANY ADVERSE ECONOMIC EFFECTS ON THE COUNTY
AS A RESULT OF THE PROPOSED INCORPORATION; AND
[(iii)] (IV) provide the county commissioners or county council with a
report on issues related to the proposed incorporation.
(2) THE COUNTY SHALL POST THE REPORT ON THE COUNTY’S
WEBSITE AS SOON AS THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OR COUNTY COUNCIL RECEIVES
THE REPORT.
[(2)] (3) During the 90–day period, the county shall cooperate fully with
the organizing committee.
(b) The organizing committee shall:
(1) notify the county liaison of all meetings and deliberations of the
organizing committee; and
(2) give the county liaison full opportunity to participate in all meetings
and deliberations of the organizing committee.
(c) Within 45 days after receiving the report required under subsection
[(a)(1)(iii)] (A)(1)(IV) of this section, the county commissioners or county council or its

SENATE BILL 546 5
designee may review the report and provide comments to the organizing committee on
issues relating to the proposed incorporation.
4–206.
(a) The organizing committee shall present to the county commissioners or county
council a proposed municipal charter:
(1) within 45 days after receiving the comments submitted to the
organizing committee under § 4–205(c) of this subtitle; or
(2) if the county commissioners or county council has not submitted
comments, within 90 days after the report is submitted by the organizing committee under
[§ 4–205(a)(1)(iii)] § 4–205(A)(1)(IV) of this subtitle.
(b) The organizing committee shall submit statements with the proposed
municipal charter describing:
(1) the likely fiscal effect of the proposed incorporation on residents of the
proposed municipality, residents in the vicinity of the proposed municipality, and the
county;
(2) the services that the proposed municipality is expected to provide; and
(3) the impact that the proposed incorporation is expected to have on
property tax rates.
4–207.
(A) IF THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OR COUNTY COUNCIL RECEIVES A
REFERENDUM REQUEST PRESENTED BY AT LEAST 40% OF THE REGISTERED VOTERS
WHO ARE RESIDENTS OF THE AREA PROPOSED TO BE INCORPORATED, THEN THE
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OR COUNTY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) APPROVE THE REFERENDUM REQUEST;
(2) SPECIFY, BY RESOLUTION, THAT A VOTE ON THE PROPOSED
INCORPORATION BY THE VOTERS OF THE AREA TO BE INCORPORATED SHALL BE
HELD IN THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION; AND
(3) INCLUDE IN THE RESOLUTION THE EXACT TEXT OF THE
PROPOSED MUNICIPAL CHARTER AS SUBMITTED BY THE ORGANIZING COMMITTEE.
[(a)] (B) (1) If the county commissioners or county council approves [the] A
referendum request PRESENTED BY LESS THAN 40% OF THE REGISTERED VOTERS
WHO ARE RESIDENTS OF THE AREA PROPOSED TO BE INCORPORATED, THEN,

SENATE BILL 546
between 40 and 60 days after it receives the proposed municipal charter, the county
commissioners or county council shall specify, by resolution, the day and hours for a vote
on the proposed incorporation by the voters of the area to be incorporated.
(2) The resolution shall include the exact text of the proposed municipal
charter as submitted by the organizing committee.
[(b)] (C) (1) If the county commissioners or county council rejects the
referendum request, the county commissioners or county council shall:
(i) provide in writing and make available to the public within a
reasonable time the reasons for the rejection; and
(ii) establish reasonable procedures by which the county
commissioners or county council shall reconsider a referendum request, including an
opportunity for a public hearing with sufficient advance public notice.
(2) After the hearing and reconsideration process is completed, the county
commissioners or county council, by resolution, shall affirm the rejection or approve the
referendum request.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.